District of Columbia statutes.
47-4437

Right of appeal to Superior Court.

A person aggrieved by a final determination of the Mayor in accordance with this subchapter may, within 6 months from the date of the determination, appeal to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in §§ 47-3303, 47-3304, and 47-3306 through 47-3308.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334